Utah statutes.
78B-7-309.   Severability clause.
If any provision of this part or its application to any person or circumstance
is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of this part which can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this part are
severable.
